Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 5. Sewerage Systems

Cross references. —

As to sanitary and improvement districts, see §§

35-3-101

to

35-3-124

.

For duty of every public or private utility furnishing water to the public to make periodical bacteriological analysis of water, see §

35-4-221

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 569 to 572 and 574; 70A Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessments § 30.

Liability of municipal corporation for damages for maintenance of sewer disposal plant as nuisance, 40 ALR2d 1177.

Municipal operation of sewage disposal plant as governmental or proprietary function, for purposes of tort liability, 57 ALR2d 1336.

Drains or sewers, municipality's liability for damage resulting from obstruction or clogging of, 59 ALR2d 281.

Sewer or drain, municipality's liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act of its officer, agent, or employee in carrying out construction or repair of, 61 ALR2d 874.

Liability of abutting landowner for injury to municipal employee engaged in constructing or repairing sewers or drains, 58 ALR3d 1085.

§ 15-7-501.
Definition.

As used in this article, “sewerage system” means a sewerage treatment plant, or plants, collecting, intercepting and outlet sewers, force mains, conduits, pumping stations, ejector stations and all other appurtenances or improvements, or any of them, necessary or useful and convenient for the collection, treatment and disposal, in a sanitary manner, of sewage and industrial wastes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 455; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-455; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-430; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-502.
General powers and duties; bonds and contracts generally.

Any city or town may:

Construct, reconstruct, improve and extend, or acquire, improve, extend and operate a sewerage system, within or without its corporate limits and may apply for and accept loans or grants or any other aid from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof under any federal law to aid in the prevention and abatement of water pollution, or may borrow money from any other source;

Issue its revenue bonds for the purposes specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection, payable solely from the revenues derived from the operation of the sewerage system;

Enter into contracts and agreements with other local public bodies covering the joint construction, operation and maintenance of a sewerage system;

Accept contributions and other aid from commercial, industrial and other establishments to aid in the prevention or abatement of water pollution, and in furtherance of that purpose enter into contracts and agreements with commercial, industrial and other establishments covering the:

Collection, treatment and disposal of sewage and industrial wastes from any commercial, industrial and other establishments;

Use and operation by any city or town of sewerage collection, treatment and disposal facilities owned by any commercial, industrial and other establishment; and

Coordination of the sewage collection, treatment and disposal facilities of the city or town with the sewage collection, treatment, and disposal facilities of commercial, industrial and other establishments.

Provide for the operation as a single enterprise of its waterworks and sewerage systems;

Issue refunding revenue bonds to refund, pay or discharge all or any part of its outstanding sewer revenue bonds, including interest, if any, in arrears or about to become due, provided the relevant provisions of this article pertaining to revenue bonds for sewerage systems are applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding revenue bonds, including their terms and security, the bond ordinance, rates and other aspects of the bonds, except it is not necessary to submit the proposition of issuing refunding revenue bonds to a vote of the people of the city or town.

The bonds specified in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section may be issued with maturities not exceeding forty (40) years and in the amounts necessary to provide sufficient funds to pay all the costs of construction, improvement, reconstruction, extension or acquisition, extension and improvements of the sewerage system, including engineering, legal and other expenses, together with interest to a date six (6) months after the estimated date of completion. The bonds shall bear interest at a designated rate or rates payable annually, semiannually or at other designated intervals and shall mature at a time or serially at times in regular numerical order at annual or other designated intervals in amounts designated and fixed by the governing body. Bonds issued under the provisions of this article are negotiable instruments and shall be executed by the mayor and clerk and sealed with the corporate seal of the city or town. If an officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceased [ceases] to be an officer before delivery of the bonds, the signatures remain valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until their delivery.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 209, § 3.

If the governing body determines to operate its waterworks and sewerage system as a single enterprise pursuant to paragraph (a)(v) of this section, it may issue revenue bonds in the manner provided in this article, payable solely from the revenue derived from the operation of the combined waterworks and sewerage system to pay for improvements, additions and extensions to the combined waterworks and sewer systems. If there are any outstanding bonds payable solely from the revenue of the waterworks or sewerage systems, or from the combined waterworks systems, the new bonds may include an amount sufficient to retire the outstanding bonds or may be made subordinate to the outstanding bonds with respect to the payment of principal, interest and security. Any law which requires that revenue derived from the operation of a waterworks system by a city or town applies only to the payment of the principal and interest of water bonds is inapplicable if the municipality operates its waterworks and sewerage system as a single enterprise, and in that case the revenues derived from operation of the water system may be used to retire either water bonds or sewerage system bonds.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 456; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-456; Laws 1969, ch. 88, § 1; 1971, ch. 254, § 9; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-431; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 3.

Applied

in

Coulter v. City of Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Municipal Action Exemption to the Federal Antitrust Laws: Increased Antitrust Exposure for Wyoming Cities and Towns,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 673 (1984).

§ 15-7-503.
Ordinance for construction; required and authorized provisions; existing bonds validated.

If the governing body determines to construct, reconstruct, acquire, improve or extend a sewerage system and to issue bonds under the provisions of this article to pay the costs, it shall adopt an ordinance generally describing the contemplated project and refer to its plans and specifications which are open for public inspection. The ordinance shall:

Set out the estimated cost of the project;

Determine the period of its usefulness;

Fix the:

Amount of revenue bonds proposed to be issued;

Maturity or maturities;

Interest rate; and

Other details in connection with the bonds.

Pledge the revenues derived from the operation of the sewerage system to:

Pay the cost of operation and maintenance of the system;

Provide an adequate depreciation fund; and

Pay the principal and interest of the bonds.

The ordinance may:

Provide that the bonds, or those specified, to the extent and in the manner prescribed, shall be subordinated to any other bonds payable from the revenues of the sewerage system as are specified in the ordinance;

Contain any covenants and restrictions upon the issuance of additional revenue bonds, which share equally from the revenues of the system, as may be necessary or advisable to assure the payment of the bonds authorized;

Provide that the revenue bonds or any part thereof may be sold to the state of Wyoming or the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof at a private sale, without advertisement, for not less than par and accrued interest;

Provide that the bonds are redeemable with or without premium at the time or place the governing body provides;

Provide that the governing body may discontinue the water supply of any person for nonpayment of the sewer service charge.

All revenue bonds issued pursuant to this article, which are outstanding on the effective date of this act, the right to the payment of which has not been barred by any pertinent statute of limitations, and all acts and proceedings heretofore had or taken, or purportedly had or taken by or on behalf of any city or town under law or under color of law preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, issuance and payment (or any combination thereof) of those revenue bonds, are validated, including but not necessarily limited to the terms, provisions, conditions and covenants of any resolution or ordinance appertaining thereto. Those outstanding revenue bonds are binding and enforceable obligations of the city or town issuing them in accordance with their terms and their authorizing proceedings.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 457; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-457; Laws 1969, ch. 88, § 2; 1971, ch. 254, § 10; 1975, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-432(a)-(d); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1969, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective upon approval. Approved February 20, 1969.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 15-1-101(a)(xv).

§ 15-7-504.
Refunding revenue bonds; purpose; required procedure; exceptions thereto.

Any city or town may issue refunding revenue bonds:

To refund and discharge or extend or shorten the maturities of all or any part of the outstanding bonds of any one (1) or more issues, including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due;

For the purpose of reducing interest costs or effecting other economies; or

For the purpose of modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations as pertained to the issues of additional bonds, otherwise concerning the outstanding bonds or to any facilities as pertained thereto.

Any refunding specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be accomplished in the manner prescribed by W.S.

16-5-102

through

16-5-119

, as from time to time amended, except that refunding revenue bonds so authorized do not constitute a debt of the city or town within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation, nor shall any tax be levied or other revenue be pledged for the payment thereof, except for the special funds authorized under this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 457; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-457; Laws 1969, ch. 88, § 2; 1971, ch. 254, § 10; 1975, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-432(e), (f); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1.

§ 15-7-505.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the authorization for local governments to issue notes in anticipation of the issuance of bonds by local governments, see §§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 200, § 1, related to anticipation notes.

§ 15-7-506.
Bonds payable from revenues and not considered indebtedness.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this article are payable solely from the revenues derived from the operation of the sewerage system and do not constitute an indebtedness of the city or town within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision. The face of each bond shall state that it has been issued under the provisions of this article, and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the city or town within any constitutional or statutory limitation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 458; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-458; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-434; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Revenue bonds not debt of municipality. —

The legislature, by virtue of the enactment of this section, has interpreted revenue bonds not to be a debt of a municipality within the meaning of art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.Laverents v. City of Cheyenne, 67 Wyo. 187, 217 P.2d 877,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1950) (decided under former similar provisions).

Thus, bonds payable from income of system not unconstitutionaldebt. —

An ordinance enacted pursuant to this section providing for the issuance of revenue bonds to pay for the construction of a sewerage disposal plant, as an addition to the present sewerage system, and providing for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds out of the income from the entire sewerage system, including the present system, as well as the sewage disposal plant to be constructed, did not create a debt within the meaning of that term as used in art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.Laverents v. Cheyenne, 67 Wyo. 187, 217 P.2d 877,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1950).

§ 15-7-507.
Revenues; deposit in fund; uses thereof.

All revenues derived from the operation of the sewerage system shall be set aside as collected and deposited in a special fund to be used only for:

Paying the cost of operating and maintaining the system;

Providing an adequate depreciation fund; and

Paying the principal and interest on the bonds issued under this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 459; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-459; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-435; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

Coulter v. City of Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 15-7-508.
Rates; general; amounts; special.

Any city or town borrowing money or receiving grants and improving, constructing or acquiring and improving a sewerage system, shall collect a charge from the users of the system at a rate sufficient to:

Pay the cost of operating and maintaining the system;

Provide an adequate depreciation fund;

Pay the principal and interest on the bonds issued; and

Repay grants.

Any city or town owning and operating a sewerage system constructed or acquired under the provisions of any law may provide by ordinance that the users of the system pay a service rate sufficient to pay the cost of operating and maintaining the system and to provide an adequate depreciation fund.

Any city or town may fix special rates as provided in W.S.

15-7-407

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 460; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-460; Laws 1975, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-436; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 43, § 1.

Cities to charge connection and use fees. —

Wyoming statutory provisions grant a city the power to levy sewer and water connection charges and to charge users of the systems in order to pay the costs of maintaining, operating, and expanding them. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Construction charge not tax. —

A service charge imposed under authority of this section for paying for the construction of a sewerage disposal plant was not a tax. Laverents v. Cheyenne, 67 Wyo. 187, 217 P.2d 877,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1950).

Subsection applies to all sewer system users alike. —

Subsection (b) of this section authorizes a service charge for (1) operation and maintenance and (2) for a depreciation fund, but fails to refer to the payment of principal and interest. This portion applies to all users of the sewer system alike including those connected to a portion of the sewer system for which construction costs were previously paid. Antlers Hotel v. Newcastle, 80 Wyo. 294, 341 P.2d 951,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1959).

Quoted in

Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 15-7-509.
Change of rates; recovery of unpaid charges; accounts.

The charges for the use of the sewerage system may be changed from time to time and except as otherwise provided in W.S.

15-7-407

shall be fixed at a rate which equitably distributes the cost of service among the users. If any service charge is not paid within thirty (30) days after it is due, the amount thereof, together with a penalty of ten percent (10%), and a reasonable attorney’s fee, may be recovered in a civil action by the city or town.

Any city or town issuing bonds under this article shall maintain a proper system of accounts showing the amount of revenue received from the sewerage system and its application. At least once each year the accounts shall be properly audited and a report of the audit shall be open for inspection at all proper times to any taxpayer, sewerage system user or any holder of any bond issued under this article, or their respective representatives.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 461; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-461; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-437; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 43, § 1.

Use of both flat rate and meters not discriminatory. —

A flat rate in some cases where others pay by meters is not per se illegal or arbitrary or discriminatory and is not per se an unjust rate. Antlers Hotel v. Newcastle, 80 Wyo. 294, 341 P.2d 951,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1959).

§ 15-7-510.
Compelling officials to perform duties.

The holder of any bond issued under this article, or of any coupon representing interest accrued thereon, by proper suit, may compel the officials of the city or town to perform all duties imposed upon them by this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 462; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-462; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-438; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-511.
Issuance of revenue bonds.

Revenue bonds under this article shall be issued in accordance with the requirements of W.S.

15-7-102

insofar as it refers to submitting the proposition to a vote of the people and when not in conflict with the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 464; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-464; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-440; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-512.
Special assessments; purposes; property included; amount; unplatted areas; nonpayment.

Any city or town may make special assessments for the construction of sewers and water mains. The assessments shall be made on all lots and pieces of ground to the center of the block, or if the sewers or water mains are constructed in an alley, then on all lots and pieces of ground to the nearest street or avenue on each side of the alley, extending along the street, avenue or alley, the distance of the improvement, according to the area of the lots or pieces of ground without regard to the buildings or improvements. The amount to be paid by each property holder shall be determined by dividing the expenses of the construction of the proposed sewer or water main among all the property holders for the benefit of whose property the sewer or water main is to be constructed. In the case of unplatted acreage within the city limits, the city or town shall consider that only the first seventy-five (75) feet in each direction from the sewer or water main is benefited and so assessed. However, if any property in an unplatted area is later connected to or receives service from the sewer or water main, that property shall be assessed its proportionate share. The amount to be assessed against each property holder shall be in proportion to the number of square feet each owns to the entire number of square feet assessed for the expense of the construction.

The city or town may adopt ordinances providing for the manner of sale, redemption and conveyance of lands sold for nonpayment of the special assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 466; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-466; 1967, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-442; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

This section is not unconstitutional as a local or special law within art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1908).

Relation of provisions applicable to first class cities. —

First class city which issued sewer bonds under statute authorizing assessments according to area and distance may take preliminary steps and apportion assessments according to area only as provided by later act applicable to all towns and cities. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

Where city of Cheyenne followed procedure authorized by statute for making local improvements in levying assessment for sewer line, procedure was proper as against contention that other statutes relating to construction of sewers in first class cities were exclusive. 57 Wyo. 121, 113 P.2d 958,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 24

.

School district not exempt from sewer assessment. —

School district property is not exempt from liability for payment of its proportionate share of special assessment for sewer line constructed by municipality in vicinity of school building. 57 Wyo. 121, 113 P.2d 958,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 24

.

District liable where it benefits from construction. —

School district is liable for payment of proportionate share of special assessment for new lateral sewer line by construction of which it would benefit, where evidence established district previously connected school building with main line without cost. 57 Wyo. 121, 113 P.2d 958,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 24

.

And funds may be used for health purposes. —

To use funds to increase and preserve health and welfare of pupils and teaching staff of schools is one of the highest and most important uses to which school moneys could be applied. 57 Wyo. 121, 113 P.2d 958,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 24

.

Cited

in

Coulter v. City of Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 15-7-513.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 463, related to right of eminent domain.

§ 15-7-514.
Provisions cumulative.

The provisions of this article are cumulative, conferring additional power on cities and towns and are not limitations upon their powers to construct, acquire and improve and operate sewerage systems.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 465; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-465; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-441; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-515.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 185, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1, related to state loan and investment board to administer construction grants, eligibility, regulations, and applications.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming state loan and investment board, see §

11-34-102

.

§ 15-7-516.
Conditions on the connection of municipal sewer service.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no city or town shall condition the connection of a municipal sewer system to a property on the inclusion of any deed restriction for that property or any other property that requires the development or provision of affordable housing. Nothing herein shall contravene the discretion of cities and towns to deny connection to the municipal sewerage system.

As used in this section, “affordable housing” means residential housing that is rented to or owned by a person who qualifies as a low income or moderate income household, however defined.

History.

2021 ch. 164, § 1, effective April 21, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 164, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 21, 2021.